Massachusetts, session 194th, H2138.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 152 of the General Laws is hereby amended in Section 33 by striking, the
following: "In all cases, the insurer shall pay the reasonable expenses of burial, not exceeding
eight times the average weekly wage in the Commonwealth as determined pursuant to subsection
(a) of Section 29 of Chapter 151A" and inserting in its place the following:-
“Reimbursable final disposition expenses shall include funeral and memorial related
expenses associated with unplanned death, including but not limited to funeral visitation
services, purchase of interment space, interment services, flowers, casket, death notices and
headstone, up to twenty-five thousand dollars or 10 times the average weekly wage, whichever is
greater."
of 1